Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF303.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.3213, is amended to read: 171.3213 THIRD-PARTY TESTING OF deleted text begin SCHOOL BUSdeleted text end new text begin CERTAINnew text end DRIVERS. new text begin (a) new text end A school district that is a third-party testing program and owns or operates school buses may enter into an agreement with other school districts to test the other districts' school bus driver employees. A school bus company that is a third-party testing program and owns or operates school buses may enter into an agreement with other school bus companies to test the other companies' school bus driver employees. new text begin (b) A transit operator that is a third-party testing program and owns or operates transit buses may enter into an agreement with other transit operators to test the other transit operators' transit bus driver employees. new text end new text begin (c)new text end A third-party testing programnew text begin that performs testing under this sectionnew text end may be reimbursed by the tested driver's school district deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin , school busnew text end companynew text begin , or transit operatornew text end . deleted text begin Thedeleted text end new text begin (d) Annew text end agreementnew text begin under this sectionnew text end must be submitted to the commissioner for approval. A certified third-party tester must be employed by deleted text begin a school district or a school bus company providingdeleted text end new text begin the third-party testing program that providesnew text end the testing services. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end